Mississippi, session 2026, SB2109.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 27-19-31, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-19-31.  (1)  The Department of Revenue is authorized and directed to establish and maintain a vehicle registration renewal system whereby the license tag attached upon a motor vehicle or trailer may be issued for five (5) years with the approval of the License Tag Commission, except for motor vehicles registered in excess of ten thousand (10,000) pounds gross vehicle weight, motor vehicles in a fleet registered under Section 27-19-66, motor vehicles in a rental fleet registered under Section 27-19-66.2, apportioned vehicles, rental and commercial trailers and buses, which shall be issued for a period of time determined by the Department of Revenue.  During each intervening year of the period for which license tags are issued, the Department of Revenue shall issue up to two (2) license decals, in lieu of the license tags, the month and year in which the license tag expires shall be specified on one (1) of the decals so issued. Motor vehicles in a corporate fleet registered under Section 27-19-66, trailers in a fleet registered under Section 27-19-66.1, motor vehicles in a rental fleet registered under Section 27-19-66.2, and apportioned vehicles shall not be issued decals specifying the month and year of expiration. Any series of tags may be cancelled by the commissioner with the approval of the License Tag Commission and a new series of tags issued. (2)  (a)  The license decals issued in lieu of the license tags shall indicate the month and the last two (2) figures of the year for which such license shall expire.  The license decals shall be attached to the license tag of the motor vehicle or trailer, and when so attached shall be deemed to be the license tag for the ensuing registration year.  The month and year decal shall be attached in an upright position in the lower right corner of the license tag.  Decals specifying the month and year of expiration shall not be required to be attached to license tags on motor vehicles in a corporate fleet registered under Section 27-19-66, trailers in a fleet registered under Section 27-19-66.1, motor vehicles in a rental fleet registered under Section 27-19-66.2, or apportioned vehicles. Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, the registration year shall be a period of one (1) year commencing on the first day of the month following the month in which the vehicle was acquired.  Beginning October 1, 1982, original registrations of motor vehicles, except motor vehicles registered in excess of ten thousand (10,000) pounds gross vehicle weight, apportioned vehicles and buses, may be made and shall be prorated for a period of from six (6) to eleven (11) months according to regulations established by the Department of Revenue to reduce a disproportionate number of registrations for a particular month.  Beginning July 1, 1995, original registrations and renewal registrations of motor vehicles in corporate fleets registered under Section 27-19-66, shall be prorated according to regulations established by the Department of Revenue so as to cause the registration of such fleet motor vehicles to coincide with the anniversary month for corporate fleets established by the Department of Revenue.  Beginning July 1, 2011, original registrations and renewal registrations of trailers in trailer fleets registered under Section 27-19-66.1 shall be prorated according to regulations established by the Department of Revenue so as to cause the registration of such trailers to coincide with the anniversary month for trailer fleets established by the Department of Revenue. Beginning January 1, 2025, original registrations and renewal registrations of motor vehicles in rental fleets registered under Section 27-19-66.2 shall be prorated according to regulations established by the Department of Revenue so as to cause the registration of such fleet motor vehicles to coincide with the anniversary month for rental fleets established by the Department of Revenue. Where a vehicle is registered for a period less than twelve (12) months, the anniversary month shall be the month of the expiration of the original license tag. Beginning July 1, 1996, original registrations and renewal registrations of motor vehicles in individual fleets registered under Section 27-19-66 shall be prorated according to regulations established by the Department of Revenue so as to cause the registration of such fleet motor vehicles to coincide with the anniversary month for individual fleets established by the county tax collector.  Where a vehicle is registered for a period less than twelve (12) months, the anniversary month shall be the month of the expiration of the original license tag. The Department of Revenue, with the approval of the License Tag Commission, shall so specify the area or areas on the license tag where the license decals shall be attached.  The number of the license tag shall be written across its face, and the number of the tag shall represent the registration number; and upon all the tags for private passenger vehicles the word "MISSISSIPPI" shall be written across the top of the tag in capital letters sufficiently large to be easily read, but upon all other tags such word may be abbreviated.  The number of the license tag shall not exceed seven (7) letters, numbers or a combination of such letters and numbers.  Also, on all tags sold and issued, an appropriate place will be provided thereon to place license decals indicating the expiration date of the tag.  For the purposes of this section and Section 27-19-32, Mississippi Code of 1972, the term "decal," "decals" or "license decal" shall mean a tab, sticker or other similar device attached to a license tag which validates same for a stated period of time. One (1) license tag and up to two (2) license decals shall be furnished for all vehicles and shall be fastened immovably twelve (12) inches or more above the ground, at the rear of the vehicle under or over the rear light, with the number in upright position so that it will be plainly visible and legible at all times, and at night at a distance of sixty (60) feet.  In the case of tractors or other motor vehicles drawing or pulling trailers, semitrailers or farm implements, the tag shall be fastened upon such vehicle twelve (12) inches or more above the ground, upon the front or back of such vehicle, with the number in an upright position.  Such license plate, all characters and any legally affixed decals shall not be defaced, covered or obstructed from view by any object, decal, sticker, paint, marking or license plate bracket or holder and shall not be equipped with a manual, electronic, or mechanical device that hides or obscures the license plate, all characters and any legally affixed decals.  Any person who defaces, covers or obstructs any portion of a license tag with any sticker, decoration, paint, marking, license plate bracket or holder or any other thing or device, in such a manner that the characters and any legally affixed decals on the tag cannot be read, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not more than Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00).  However, it shall not be unlawful for the county name to be partially or completely obstructed from view by any object, decal, sticker or license plate bracket or holder.  Unless the license tag with current decals is fastened to the vehicle as herein provided, the said vehicle shall be regarded as operating without a license tag, and the owner or operator shall be liable for the penalties herein provided. In addition to the above requirements, license tags for private passenger vehicles shall have a county designation thereon referencing the name of the county in which such vehicle is registered. Law enforcement officers of this state shall remove from a motor vehicle or trailer any license tag and/or decals which are so defaced that proper identification cannot be reasonably made.  The officer shall issue to the driver of such vehicle a tag permit which shall be valid for a period of five (5) days.  Each person receiving such tag permit shall purchase, within five (5) days from the date of the issuance of the permit, a new tag and/or decals for the fee set forth in Section 27-19-37, Mississippi Code of 1972, for a substitute tag. Any person who has a license tag or decals on a vehicle which may be so defaced that proper identification cannot be reasonably made may remove such and purchase another license tag and/or decals for the same fee required for a substitute tag.  If any license tag shall deteriorate due to age so that identification cannot be reasonably made, the owner may surrender such tag to the issuing authority and be issued a new tag and like decals at no cost. (b)  Beginning January 1, 2024, an owner of a private carrier of passengers or motorcycle may choose a tag with a black background and a white pinstripe border. "Mississippi" shall be printed at the top, and the name of the county shall be printed at the bottom.  The application and the additional fee of Thirty-eight Dollars and Twenty-five Cents ($38.25), less Two Dollars ($2.00) to be remitted to the Department of Revenue License Tag Acquisition Fund created in Section 27-19-179, shall be remitted to the department on a monthly basis as prescribed by the department.  The remaining Thirty-six Dollars and Twenty-five Cents ($36.25) of the additional fee shall be deposited to the credit of the Law Enforcement Officers and Fire Fighters Death Benefits Trust Fund established in Section 45-2-1.  In all other respects, tags issued under this paragraph (b) shall follow the guidelines for tags issued under paragraph (a) of this subsection. (3)  The Department of Revenue is authorized to promulgate appropriate rules and regulations to govern the use and display of license decals and to publish a summary thereof which shall be available to state officials and the public upon request. SECTION 2.  Section 27-19-131, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 27-19-131.  (1)  Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, any owner, operator, dealer, agent, or any other person who shall operate or cause to be operated upon the highways of this state, without having paid the privilege license tax or fee required by the provisions of this article, or without having the license tag or required license tag and decals affixed upon such vehicle as required by law, or who shall alter or change any license tag or decals issued in any way, or who except for a violation of subsection (2) of this section, shall violate any other provision of this article, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not less than Ten Dollars ($10.00) and not more than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00), or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than thirty (30) days, or by both such fine and imprisonment. (2)  Any owner, operator, dealer, agent or any other person who shall operate or cause to be operated upon the highways of this state, without having paid the privilege license tax or fee required by the provisions of this article and who knowingly and intentionally (a) displays an out-of-state license tag on the motor vehicle; or (b) displays a license tag or decal on the motor vehicle which was issued for another vehicle, shall upon conviction be fined not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), or be imprisoned in the county jail for not more than one (1) year, or both.  For the purposes of this subsection (2) a prima facie case of a knowing and intentional violation of this subsection shall be established upon evidence that such person is more than ninety (90) days delinquent in paying the privilege license tax and fees for such vehicle as required under this article. (3)  Any vehicle hereinabove described may be cited whether the violation is observed when the vehicle is actually in operation on the highway or not. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.